Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE A. HEALTH COVERAGE IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 1218. COVERAGE FOR ELECTIVE ABORTION; PROHIBITIONS AND REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 1218.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "elective abortion" means an abortion, as defined by Section 245.002, Health and Safety Code, other than an abortion performed due to a medical emergency as defined by Section 171.002, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 214), Sec. 2, eff. December 1, 2017.

Sec. 1218.002. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. (a) This chapter applies only to a health benefit plan that provides benefits for medical or surgical expenses incurred as a result of a health condition, accident, or sickness, including an individual, group, blanket, or franchise insurance policy or insurance agreement, a group hospital service contract, or an individual or group evidence of coverage or similar coverage document that is offered by:

(1) an insurance company;

(2) a group hospital service corporation operating under Chapter 842;

(3) a fraternal benefit society operating under Chapter 885;

(4) a stipulated premium company operating under Chapter 884;

(5) an exchange operating under Chapter 942;

(6) a health maintenance organization operating under Chapter 843;

(7) a multiple employer welfare arrangement that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 846; or

(8) an approved nonprofit health corporation that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 844.

(b) This chapter applies to group health coverage made available by a school district in accordance with Section 22.004, Education Code.

(c) Notwithstanding any provision in Chapter 1551, 1575, 1579, or 1601 or any other law, this chapter applies to:

(1) a basic coverage plan under Chapter 1551;

(2) a basic plan under Chapter 1575;

(3) a primary care coverage plan under Chapter 1579; and

(4) basic coverage under Chapter 1601.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 1501.251 or any other law, this chapter applies to coverage under a small or large employer health benefit plan subject to Chapter 1501.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 1507.003 or 1507.053 or any other law, this chapter applies to a standard health benefit plan provided under Chapter 1507.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 214), Sec. 2, eff. December 1, 2017.

Sec. 1218.003. CERTAIN COVERAGE NOT AFFECTED. This chapter does not apply to health benefit plan coverage provided to an enrollee for any abortion other than an elective abortion as defined by Section 1218.001.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 214), Sec. 2, eff. December 1, 2017.

Sec. 1218.004. COVERAGE BY HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN. A health benefit plan may provide coverage for elective abortion only if:

(1) the coverage is provided to an enrollee separately from other health benefit plan coverage offered by the health benefit plan issuer;

(2) the enrollee pays the premium for coverage for elective abortion separately from, and in addition to, the premium for other health benefit plan coverage, if any; and

(3) the enrollee provides a signature for coverage for elective abortion, separately and distinct from the signature required for other health benefit plan coverage, if any, provided to the enrollee by the health benefit plan issuer.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 214), Sec. 2, eff. December 1, 2017.

Sec. 1218.005. CALCULATION OF PREMIUM. (a) A health benefit plan issuer that provides coverage for elective abortion shall calculate the premium for the coverage so that the premium fully covers the estimated cost of elective abortion per enrollee, determined on an actuarial basis.

(b) In calculating a premium under Subsection (a), the health benefit plan issuer may not take into account any cost savings in other health benefit plan coverage offered by the health benefit plan issuer that is estimated to result from coverage for elective abortion.

(c) A health benefit plan issuer may not provide a premium discount to or reduce the premium for an enrollee for other health benefit plan coverage on the basis that the enrollee has coverage for elective abortion.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 214), Sec. 2, eff. December 1, 2017.

Sec. 1218.006. NOTICE BY ISSUER. A health benefit plan issuer that provides coverage for elective abortion shall at the time of enrollment in other health benefit plan coverage provide each enrollee with a notice that:

(1) coverage for elective abortion is optional and separate from other health benefit plan coverage offered by the health benefit plan issuer;

(2) the premium cost for coverage for elective abortion is a premium paid separately from, and in addition to, the premium for other health benefit plan coverage offered by the health benefit plan issuer; and

(3) the enrollee may enroll in a health benefit plan without obtaining coverage for elective abortion.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 214), Sec. 2, eff. December 1, 2017.